District of Columbia statutes.
2-1912

Compensation and payments.

(a)

An appointed interpreter shall receive a reasonable fee for the interpreter’s services.

(b)

The salaries, fees, expenses, and costs incident to providing the services of interpreters under this chapter shall be paid for by the Office.

(c)

Except in cases in which the communication-impaired person is financially unable to obtain adequate interpreter services, the appointing authority in any court of the District of Columbia may direct that all or part of the salaries, fees, expenses, and costs incurred for interpreter services be apportioned among the parties in a civil action or may be taxed as costs in a civil action.

Jan. 28, 1988, D.C. Law 7-62, § 13, 34 DCR 7426
This section is referenced in § 2-1911.
1981 Ed., § 31-2712.